Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. District Commissioners Generally

Cross references. —

For provision that board of directors of conservancy districts shall be elected in the same manner as irrigation district commissioners, see §

41-3-740

.

As to board of district managers relative to joint operations of irrigation and drainage districts, see §§

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to suspension, etc., of commissioners upon default in payment of state bonds, see §

41-6-203

.

As to appointment, etc., of special commissioners upon default in payment of bonds held by state, see §

41-6-204

et seq.

As to powers and duties of commissioners relative to assessments, see §§

41-7-401

through

41-7-415

.

As to board of directors of public irrigation and power districts, see §§

41-7-805

through

41-7-812

.

For authority of commissioners as to dissolution of district, see §

41-7-1001

.

As to drainage district commissioners generally, see §

41-9-116

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-301.
To be public officers; presumption in favor of validity of official acts.

Commissioners of irrigation districts are hereby declared to be public officers. The presumption shall be in favor of the regularity and validity of all their official acts. Whenever any report of the commissioners of any irrigation district or any part of any such report is contested, remonstrated against or called in question, the burden of proof shall rest upon the contestant, remonstrant or questioner.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 53; C.S. 1920, § 987; R.S. 1931, § 122-738; C.S. 1945, § 71-838; W.S. 1957, § 41-283.

Power to contract. —

The commissioners having power to borrow money, and issue bonds of the district, clearly had power to enter into contract for the purpose of securing such money, and they had right to meet all conditions made by the United States government, at least if not unreasonable, and not in conflict with laws of the state. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Imposition of minimum charge on water users deemed valid. —

Where parties protesting the imposition of a minimum charge on water users within an irrigation district have not established by any evidence that the commissioners have fraudulently or capriciously applied the authorization given them by statute, the court must conclude that the commissioners were given a discretion to fix a minimum assessment, and the amount fixed by them is valid. Casper-Alcova Irrigation Dist. v. Irving, 584 P.2d 1064,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Lincoln Land Co. v. Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1930).

§ 41-7-302.
Oath and bond; quorum; term; removal; vacancies.

Before entering upon their duties, commissioners shall take and subscribe an oath to support the constitution of the United States and the constitution of the state of Wyoming, to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as commissioners and to render a true account of their doing to the court by which they are appointed whenever required by law or the order of the court. Commissioners shall execute a bond running to the clerk of court and his successors in office as obligees, to be filed with the clerk for the benefit of the parties interested, in an amount to be fixed by the court or presiding judge, and with sureties to be approved by the court or presiding judge, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their duties as commissioners and the faithful accounting of all monies which shall come into their hands as commissioners. A majority shall constitute a quorum and a concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be sufficient to its determination. The commissioners appointed shall hold their office until the first regular meeting of the commissioners following the date of the order organizing the district and until their respective successors are qualified under the provisions of W.S.

41-7-316

. The commissioners appointed by the secretary of the interior shall be subject to removal from office and any commissioner appointed by the secretary of the interior to fill a vacancy shall hold office until less than a majority of the lands within the district are unentered public lands, after which the commissioners shall be elected as otherwise provided in this chapter. If the office of any commissioner so appointed shall become vacant by reason of death, or other cause, the court or judge thereof shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 17, 18; C.S. 1920, § 961; Laws 1923, ch. 91, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-711; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 55, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-811; W.S. 1957, § 41-284; Laws 1995, ch. 151, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of commissioners upon organization, see §

41-7-210

.

As to election, term, etc., of commissioners, see §§

41-7-316

to

41-7-318

.

§ 41-7-303.
Organization as board; officers; powers and duties generally; contracts and cooperation with United States generally.

The commissioners appointed as aforesaid, and their successors in office, shall, from the entry of such order of confirmation, constitute the corporate authority of said irrigation district, and shall exercise the functions conferred on them by law. They shall organize as a board, elect a president from their number and appoint a secretary-treasurer who may or may not be a member of the board. The board shall have power, and it shall be their duty, to adopt bylaws, manage and conduct the affairs and business of the district, make and execute all necessary contracts, employ such agents, attorneys, officers and employees as may be required, and prescribe their duties, establish equitable rules and regulations for the distribution and use of water to and upon the lands of the district; provided, always, that such rules shall not be in conflict with or contrary to any statute of this state relative to such matters; and generally to perform all such acts as shall be necessary to fully carry out the purposes of this article [chapter]. Said board shall have the power in addition to the means to supply water to said district proposed by the petition submitted for the formation of said district, to construct, acquire or purchase any and all canals, ditches, reservoirs, reservoir sites, water rights, rights of way, or other property necessary for the use of the district. In case of the purchase of any property by such district the bonds of the district hereinafter provided for may be used at their par value in payment without previous offer of such bonds for sale. For the purpose of acquiring control over government land within the district and complying with the provisions of the act of congress of August 11, 1916 [43 U.S.C. §§ 621 through 630], the board shall have authority to make such investigation, and based thereon, such representation and assurances to the secretary of the interior as may be requisite; and the board may contract with the United States for the construction, operation and maintenance of the necessary works for the delivery and distribution of water therefrom under the provisions of the federal reclamation act, and all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto and the rules and regulations established thereunder, or for the assumption, as principal or guarantor of the indebtedness to the United States on account of district lands. The board may contract with the United States for a water supply under any act of congress providing for or permitting such contract and in case any contract has been or may thereafter be made with the United States as herein provided, bonds of the district may be deposited with the United States at ninety percent (90%) of their par value, to the amount to be paid by the district to the United States under any such contract, the interest on said bonds, if bearing interest, to be provided for by assessment and levy as in case of other bonds of the district and regularly paid to the United States to be applied as provided in such contract; and if bonds of the district are not so deposited it shall be the duty of the board to include as part of any levy or assessment provided for herein, an amount sufficient to meet each year all payments accruing under the terms of any such contract; and the board may accept on behalf of the district, appointment of the district as a fiscal agent of the United States, or authorization of the district by the United States to make collection of moneys for or on behalf of the United States, in connection with any federal reclamation project, whereupon the district shall be authorized to so act and to assume the duties and liabilities incident to such action, and the said board shall have full power to do any and all things required by the federal statutes now or hereafter enacted in connection therewith, and all things required by the rules and regulations now or that may hereafter be established by any department of the federal government in regard thereto. The board shall have the power to buy, develop, sell and distribute electrical energy as an incident to the ownership, control and operation of the irrigation works of the district or the cooperative works of the district and the United States and to use, sell and distribute the same. The said rules and regulations shall be printed in convenient form as soon as the same are adopted, for the distribution in the district; provided, however, that the commissioners of the district shall not contract with the United States for the construction, operation or maintenance of the necessary works for the delivery and distribution of water to district lands, or for the drainage of district lands, under the provisions of the federal reclamation act and any act or acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or the rules and regulations established thereunder, or for the assumption as principal or guarantor, of indebtedness to the United States on account of district lands, or for a water supply or drainage incident to irrigation under any act of congress providing for or permitting such contract, or for acceptance by the district of appointment or authorization as fiscal agent of the United States to make collections of moneys for or on behalf of the United States in connection with any federal reclamation project, until there has been an election duly held at which a majority of the qualified electors present and voting have voted in favor of making any such contract.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 23; C.S. 1920, § 963; Laws 1921, ch. 121, § 1; 1923, ch. 91, § 3; 1925, ch. 53, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-713; Laws 1939, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-813; W.S. 1957, § 41-285.

Cross references. —

As to general powers of irrigation district as corporation, see §

41-7-210

.

See also §§

41-7-401

and

41-7-601

through

41-7-603

as to construction contracts with United States generally.

The statutes applicable are the measure of the power possessed by the district and its commissioners. —

In re Bear River Irrigation Dist., 51 Wyo. 343, 65 P.2d 686,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1937).

Power of contract. —

Commissioners having power to borrow money and issue bonds of the district clearly had power to enter into contract for purpose of securing such money, they had the right to meet all conditions made by the United States government, at least if not unreasonable, and not in conflict with laws of the state. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Contract for assumption of indebtedness. —

A contract is not under our statute an idle ceremony. It must be approved by the commissioners and by the water users. It is intended for the direct purpose to lighten the economic burden of the water users as much as possible and to determine, at least in part, as to whether or not the project is feasible from an economic standpoint. It follows of course logically that to enable that to be done the district must first be organized. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Commissioners of irrigation district had no authority to enter into a contract with the United States

providing for the furnishing of water to the district under a proposed irrigation works at a cost to the district of $1,410,750, where the contract did not provide for a transfer of title to the irrigation works from the United States to the district when contract price was paid. Owl Creek Irrigation Dist., 71 Wyo. 30, 253 P.2d 867,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1953).

Limitation on power to borrow. —

Limitation upon power of district to borrow money is an amount “not to exceed the amount due on assessments,” and the board cannot be authorized to issue notes or warrants until an assessment has been made and confirmed by the court. In re Bear River Irrigation Dist., 51 Wyo. 343, 65 P.2d 686,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1937).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Lincoln Land Co. v. Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1930).

§ 41-7-304.
Financial records and reports; compensation and expenses; suit on bonds.

The commissioners shall keep an accurate record of all monies collected on account of the work under their charge and of all payments made by them, and shall take vouchers for payments and shall keep full, accurate and true minutes of all their proceedings. On or before the tenth day of July each year the commissioners shall file in the office of the clerk of the court having jurisdiction in the matter, an itemized statement of all their receipts and disbursements, for the preceding fiscal year, and leave the report in the office for examination by parties interested at all times, and include a copy thereof in the regular call for the annual meeting hereinafter provided. They shall receive for their services compensation as the court or presiding judge thereof may determine. They shall also be reimbursed for their actual reasonable expenses. Suit may also be brought upon their bonds, and the amount recovered shall be applied to the construction of the work or to the party injured, as justice may require.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 19 to 22; C.S. 1920, § 962; R.S. 1931, § 122-712; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-812; W.S. 1957, § 41-286; Laws 1995, ch. 151, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “of January each year in a district which uses a calendar year for elections under W.S. 41 7 316, and on or before the tenth day” preceding “of July each year” and deleted “in a district which uses a fiscal year for elections under W.S. 41 7 316,” thereafter in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 41-7-305.
Maps and plans of proposed work; reports to court generally.

As soon as may be after the organization of said district, or within such time as the court may direct, said commissioners shall proceed to have all necessary levels taken and surveys made, and shall lay out said proposed work, make a map thereof and plans, profiles and other specifications thereof, and report in writing to the court:

The extent and character of the proposed work and the sufficiency of the water supply;

What lands within the district, as by them reported will be injured by the proposed work, if any, and they shall therein award to each tract, lot, easement or interest by whomsoever held, the amount of damages which they shall determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work;

All lands within the district as by them reported will be benefited by the proposed work and they shall assess against such lands by whomsoever held the amount of benefits which they determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work, and in case of lands having appurtenant thereto a partial water right or partial rights in a system of irrigation the assessment shall be according to benefits making due allowance for existing rights. The benefits so assessed are herein referred to as “the assessment roll”.

If it be found necessary to change the boundaries of said proposed district, previously fixed, they shall report said proposed change, and, if possible, shall report the names, the residence and post-office addresses of the owners or persons entitled to possession of all lands affected by said change in boundaries, but no such change in boundaries shall be made as to deprive the court of jurisdiction; provided, however, that the owners and those entitled to possession, by virtue of public land filing, of lands adjacent to the district, petition to have their lands brought into the district such petitioners may be considered the same as the original petitioners in making changes of boundaries.

They shall also determine and report to the court the total itemized amount as near as they can determine, that said proposed work will cost, including organization expenses and the unit cost upon which the assessments are based, which shall be designated as “cost of construction”.

If the cost of construction of any particular part of the work so proposed to be done shall be assessed upon any particular tract or tracts, lot or lots of land, the commissioners shall so specify, and in their report they shall fix and determine the sums which should be assessed against said tracts and lots, and assess such sum against said tracts and lots.

They shall apportion and assess the part of this “cost of construction” not assessed as above, against the several benefited tracts and lots in said irrigation district, in proportion to the benefits which they have assessed against the same, by setting down opposite each tract or lot the sum which they assess against the same for construction. The assessments which together make up the cost of construction, as above defined, as herein referred to as “assessments for construction”.

They shall set forth in their report the amount of water by them apportioned to each separate tract or lot of land in said district, to be assessed.

The commissioners shall further report to the court the probable cost of keeping said proposed work in repair after it is completed.

They shall include in their said report, said map, plans and other specifications, and file the same with their report.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 24; C.S. 1920, § 964; R.S. 1931, § 122-714; C.S. 1945, § 71-814; W.S. 1957, § 41-287.

Originally, even the cost
of maintenance was within the provisions of §

41-7-201

so as to require
the filing of the report under this section.

—

In 1923 the
legislature revised § 973, C.S. 1920 (now
§

41-7-401

), and added the section which is now
§

41-7-402

, providing for the filing with the court of an “itemized
estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district
for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance and to meet
the yearly current expenses of the district.” Such additional provision
in effect eliminated the “expenses of any current year” from the requirements
of
§§

41-7-201

,

41-7-305

.Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Where it is not contended
that any report was ever made under the provisions of this section,
§

41-7-406

is inapplicable. —

It seems clear that
§

41-7-406

purports to deal with inadvertent omissions of certain
areas rather than failure to file an assessment of benefits on all
the lands in the district.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

This section contemplates that a definite portion of water shall be set off to every landowner

in the district. Biddick v. Laramie Valley Mun. Irrigation Dist., 76 Wyo. 67, 299 P.2d 1059,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1956).

The words “new work” used
in the statute (§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

) are to be read in connection
with the words “expenses of any current year”

and when
so construed mean work which may in one sense be considered new, as
distinguished from strict maintenance, but is nevertheless work which
would tend to continue the district in as good condition as in the
past rather than an extension of the irrigation works or improvement
of the existing water supply. Any question on such classification
of proposed work is subject to determination by the district court
to which the budget is submitted.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

To state it another way,
§

41-7-402

, providing for the submission of an itemized estimate
of yearly current expenses and hearing thereon after notice, sufficiently
protects the freeholders as interested parties and informs the court
so that an intelligent determination may be made as to the assessments
for such purposes. Any other assessments can be effective only after
due hearings based on preliminary engineering report (§

41-7-201

) and commissioners' report (§

41-7-305

). This will inform landowners as to the proposed expenditures,
the measure of the prospective benefits, and their assumption of the
increased expenses and will simultaneously enable the court to make
intelligent decisions thereon.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Limitation on powers. —

Limitation upon power of district to borrow money is an amount “not to exceed the amount due on assessments,” and board cannot be authorized to issue notes or warrants until an assessment has been made and confirmed by the court. In re Bear River Irrigation Dist., 51 Wyo. 343, 65 P.2d 686,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1937).

Refusal of trial court to subtract signatures from petition sustained. —

A number of signers previously signed a petition to join the Midvale irrigation district as provided by subsection (b) of this section. These parties, however, and their acreage in the North Pavillion area, had not been taken into the Midvale irrigation district at the time of the organization of this district, and the trial court refused to subtract these signers from the number of signers of the petition. The supreme court held that the action of the trial court was correct. Gies v. Boehm, 78 Wyo. 449, 329 P.2d 807,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1958).

Item held properly struck. —

Where an item requested by the commissioners in their petition for adjudication of June 2, 1958, was one falling within the provisions of §

41-7-201

, the officers of the district having ignored the clear prerequisites of the irrigation district statutes, the trial court had no alternative but to strike the item. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Lincoln Land Co. v. Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1930).

§ 41-7-306.
Power to alter location of irrigation works; power of court to alter plans proposed by commissioners.

The commissioners shall not be confined to the points of location, commencement, routes or termini of the reservoirs, canals, ditches or other work, or the number, extent or size of the same, as proposed by the petitioners, but shall locate, design, lay out and plan same in such manner as to them shall seem best to promote the public welfare, and to reclaim or benefit the lands of the parties interested with the least damage and greatest benefit to all lands affected thereby. And any plan proposed by the commission, may, on the application of any person interested, on the hearing hereinafter provided for, or on the application of the commissioners, be altered by the court, by written order, in such manner as shall appear to the court to be just.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 25; C.S. 1920, § 965; R.S. 1931, § 122-715; C.S. 1945, § 71-815; W.S. 1957, § 41-288.

Reasonable changes. —

Changes in proposed plans of irrigation project should be reasonable in view of original plan and not formulated with idea of adding heavy costs under plans never intended when scope of plans is viewed in its entirety. In re Washakie Needles Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 518, 76 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1938).

§ 41-7-307.
Exclusion or inclusion of lands in district; review of report by court generally.

If the commissioners find that the proposed district, as described in the petition filed, will not embrace all of the lands that will be benefited by the proposed work, or that it will include lands that will not be benefited and are not necessary to be included in said district for any purpose, they shall extend or contract the boundaries of the proposed district so as to include or exclude all such lands, as the case may be; and the boundaries adopted and reported by them, may upon the hearing of their report, as hereinafter provided, upon their application, be altered by the court in such manner as shall appear to be just; provided, that the alteration of boundaries as aforesaid shall not have the effect of so far enlarging or contracting the proposed district as to render such petition void or dismissible. Said report shall be filed with the clerk of the court.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 26; C.S. 1920, § 966; R.S. 1931, § 122-716; C.S. 1945, § 71-816; W.S. 1957, § 41-289.

Cross references. —

As to land that may be included in proposed district, see §

41-7-203

.

Private owners of land not included in original irrigation district could not be forced into the district

where the district and the United States had entered into a contract containing provisions which as applied to private owners of land were unreasonable, coercive, and deprived them of their property against their will. Owl Creek Irrigation Dist., 71 Wyo. 30, 253 P.2d 867,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1953).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-308.
Hearings on commissioners' report; filing of objections; notice generally.

Upon the filing of the said report, the court or judge thereof, shall make and enter an order fixing the time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and object to the confirmation thereof. All objections shall be in writing and shall clearly specify the grounds of objection and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of court wherein said report is filed at least five (5) days prior to the date set for the hearing. The clerk of said court shall cause notice of the time and place of such hearing to be given to all parties interested, which notice shall contain a brief description of the lands benefited and damaged, together with the net damage awarded the several tracts, parcels, easements and corporations to which damages are awarded, and the sum in each case assessed for benefits and cost of construction against the several benefited parcels, tracts, easements and corporations, and the amount of water apportioned to each acre of land in the district. Said notice shall be published for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, prior to the day set for the hearing, in one (1) newspaper published in each county in which said lands, or any part thereof within said district are situate (and if no newspaper is published in said county, in some newspaper in an adjoining county), and by serving a copy of such notice on each of the persons or corporations by said report recommended to be assessed, or whose lands are by said report recommended to be included in said district, and who resides in any of the counties in which any lands of the proposed district are situated, at least twelve (12) days before the day of hearing in the same manner that a summons is required to be served; provided, absence from the county of such person, or corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 27, 28; R.S. 1920, § 967; R.S. 1931, § 122-717; Laws 1937, ch. 23, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-817; W.S. 1957, § 41-290.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-309.
Hearings on commissioners' report; notice when land situated in more than 1 county.

In case the lands are situated in more than one (1) county the notice published in the county wherein the court having jurisdiction is situated shall contain a description of all the lands in said proposed district, the damages awarded to the several parcels thereof and the amounts assessed for benefits against the several parcels thereof, but the notice published in any other county or counties may contain a description of only the lands situate in said county for which said publication is made, together with the damages awarded to and assessments for benefits against the several tracts, parcels, easements and interests situate in said county for which publication is made. In case of service of said notice personally or the acceptance and waiver thereof of all the owners of the lands within the district, said service shall be sufficient and give the court jurisdiction without said publication.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 29, 30; C.S. 1920, § 968; R.S. 1931, § 122-718; C.S. 1945, § 71-818; W.S. 1957, § 41-291.

§ 41-7-310.
Hearings on commissioners' report; procedure when report requires modification.

If the court finds that the report requires modification, the same may by order of the court be referred back to the commissioners, who may be required to modify it in any respect.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 31; C.S. 1920, § 969; R.S. 1931, § 122-719; C.S. 1945, § 71-819; W.S. 1957, § 41-292.

§ 41-7-311.
Hearings on commissioners' report; confirmation of report.

If there be no remonstrance, or if the finding be in favor of the validity of the proceedings, or after the report shall have been modified to conform to the findings, the court shall confirm the report and the order of the confirmation shall be final and conclusive, the proposed work shall be established and authorized, and the proposed assessments approved and confirmed unless within thirty (30) days an appeal be taken to the supreme court, and the said order of confirmation shall also fix the commissioners’ bond.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 32; C.S. 1920, § 970; R.S. 1931, § 122-720; C.S. 1945, § 71-820; W.S. 1957, § 41-293.

Reassessments. —

Where 14 years after original assessment of benefits conditions apparently required reduction of some assessments, it became advisable that future proceedings include a general reassessment that should be reported to the court for confirmation after proper notice. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 49 Wyo. 395, 54 P.2d 808,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1936).

Time for appeal. —

This section fixes the time within which an appeal may be taken. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 48 Wyo. 523, 52 P.2d 410,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1935).

Unnecessary extension of time. —

Parties lose no rights on appealing from order under irrigation district law by applying for unnecessary extension of time for perfecting their appeal where their appeal is thereafter perfected within time prescribed by direct appeal statute. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 48 Wyo. 523, 52 P.2d 410,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-312.
Hearings on commissioners' report; revision of confirmation.

Said order of confirmation may, at the same or at any subsequent term of said court be revised, modified or changed, in whole or in part, on petition of the commissioners, after such notice as the court may require to parties interested. At any time prior to making the order confirming said report or thereafter, the court may permit the commissioners to present and file a supplemental report, or amend their report, as to any matter which, pursuant to the provisions hereof, was or might have been included in the original report presented by them, and after reasonable notice given to all parties interested, in such manner as the court shall direct, the court may, upon the hearing in said matter, make such order as the case may require.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 33, 34; C.S. 1920, § 971; R.S. 1931, § 122-721; C.S. 1945, § 71-821; W.S. 1957, § 41-294.

Reassessments. —

In view of time which has elapsed since original assessment (14 years) and admitted change in conditions that apparently required reduction in some of the assessments, court found it advisable that future proceedings include a general reassessment which should be reported to court for confirmation after proper notice. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 49 Wyo. 395, 54 P.2d 808,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1936).

Reduction in assessment of benefits cannot be disregarded de minimis non curat lex; the reduction is about six percent of the total assessments, and on assessments for construction cost amounts to more than a dollar per acre of irrigable land in the district. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 49 Wyo. 395, 54 P.2d 808,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1936).

Result of reduction in the assessment of benefits to part of lands in the district is an increase in the burden on the other lands, and cannot be affirmed. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 49 Wyo. 395, 54 P.2d 808,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1936).

Limitation on power to borrow. —

Limitation upon power of district to borrow money is an amount “not to exceed the amount due on assessments,” and board cannot be authorized to issue notes or warrants until an assessment has been made and confirmed by the court. In re Bear River Irrigation Dist., 51 Wyo. 343, 65 P.2d 686,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1937).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1959).

§ 41-7-313.
Hearings on commissioners' report; payment of costs when objections dismissed.

In case the petition or proceedings are dismissed as provided herein, a judgment shall be entered against the petitioners and in favor of the commissioners for the costs, expenses, and liabilities incurred in said proceedings, for the benefit of those who have rendered services or advanced money in the prosecution of said proceedings, or have recovered costs on successful contests therein. Before any such judgment is entered, said commissioners shall file with the clerk of the district court, in which said proceedings were instituted, an itemized statement of such costs and expenses, duly verified, upon which an order shall issue, requiring said petitioners to show cause before said court, at a time and place named, why judgment should not be entered against said petitioners for the amount of said costs and expenses. Notice of the hearing on said order, to show cause, shall be given to said petitioners, by mailing to each a copy thereof, to their last known post office address, at least twenty (20) days prior to the time set for hearing, and by publication of the same in one (1) or more newspapers, published in the county, where the proceedings are pending, at least three (3) successive weeks prior to the day set for such hearing. Said motion need not contain an itemized statement of said account. All petitioners shall, among themselves, contribute in the payment of said judgment, in proportion to the number of acres of land they have within the boundaries of the proposed district at the time of filing said petition.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 35 to 37; C.S. 1920, § 972; R.S. 1931, § 122-722; C.S. 1945, § 71-822; W.S. 1957, § 41-295.

§ 41-7-314.
Power to enter land to repair irrigation works; construction of ditches across railway rights-of-way.

The commissioners, their agents, servants, and employees shall have the right to go upon all lands along any reservoirs, ditch, canal, or embankment in their district, to inspect, deepen, widen and repair the same whenever necessary, doing no unnecessary damage, and shall not be liable for trespass therefor.

Said commissioners shall have the right to lay out and construct all necessary canals, ditches, drains and embankments across any railway right-of-way or yard within their district, and any railway company whose right-of-way or yard is crossed by the line of any proposed canal, ditch, drain or embankment shall open its right-of-way or yard and permit such canal, ditch, drain or embankment to cross the same as soon as such canal, ditch, drain or embankment is constructed to such right-of-way. Upon receiving fifteen (15) days notice in writing any railway company across whose right-of-way or yard any such canal, ditch, drain or embankment is laid out, shall open its right-of-way or yard and permit said commissioners and their contractors, agents and employees to construct such canal, ditch, drain or embankment across said right-of-way or yard. For every day that such railway company fails, after the end of said fifteen (15) days to open its right-of-way or yard as hereinbefore required, it shall forfeit twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to said irrigation district to be collected in an action as other forfeitures are collected, or to be set off against any damages that have been awarded to such railway company. If such railway company fails to open its right-of-way or yard along the line of any such canal, ditch, drain or embankment, the commissioners may at any time after the expiration of said fifteen (15) days open such right-of-way or yard along the line of such canal, ditch, drain or embankment and construct the same. Every irrigation district shall be liable to the railway company whose right-of-way or yard is crossed by any canal, ditch, drain or embankment of the district, for the reasonable cost of any culverts or bridges for railway purposes made necessary by the crossing of such right-of-way or yard by any such canal, ditch, drain or embankment, but the cost so entailed shall not be greater than the average cost of other culverts and bridges of similar size installed on the same division of the railway, and crossing streams, canals, ditches or drains of approximately the same width and depth within a distance of one hundred (100) miles of the canals, ditches or drains of said district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 44; C.S. 1920, § 978; Laws 1923, ch. 91, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-728; C.S. 1945, § 71-828; W.S. 1957, § 41-296.